Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 1. Board of Agriculture

Cross references. —

As to duty to supervise, operate and maintain pioneer memorial museum, see §

11-10-113

.

As to appointment of state seed analyst, see §

11-12-115

.

§ 11-2-101.
Department and board created; director.

A state department of agriculture is created under the management and control of the director with the advice of the board of agriculture.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 191, § 4.

The department is authorized to accept, administer and expend agricultural commodity promotion, research and advertising assessments.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 100, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 5-101; C.S. 1945, § 34-101; W.S. 1957, § 11-2; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 111, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, §§ 3, 4.

Task force. —

Laws 2005, ch. 125, § 1, directs the state health officer and the department of health in collaboration with the Wyoming department of agriculture and the Wyoming department of environmental quality to convene a multi-disciplinary task force to conduct a study of environmental health issues currently identified, the state and federal agencies to whom those issues are currently assigned and those environmental health threats identified but not clearly assigned to a particular state agency. The study is to examine overlapping governmental jurisdiction and jurisdictional gaps in environmental health matters and, to the extent needed, recommend solutions to these problems. The department is to produce and submit a comprehensive plan to coordinate and clarify agency responsibility for environmental health issues, together with recommendations for any initial legislation, to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee by November 15, 2005. The act appropriates $50,000 from the general fund to the department of health to implement the purposes of this act and further provides that the department of health may use existing resources and apply for any federal or private grants that may be available to augment funding for the required study and plan.

Laws 2005, ch. 125, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

§ 11-2-102.
Composition;
qualifications; appointment and removal of members; quorum.

The board shall consist of thirteen (13) members, including the governor and the dean of the University of Wyoming college of agriculture or his designated representative as ex officio nonvoting members. Eleven (11) voting members shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate and may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

One (1) member shall be appointed from each of the seven (7) appointment districts pursuant to W.S.

9-1-218

. Appointments in each appointment district shall be rotated among the several counties comprising the district.

Members appointed in accordance with subsection (b) of this section from appointment districts shall be appointed for a term of six (6) years.

The seven (7) members appointed from the appointment districts:

Shall be selected to represent a cross-section of the agricultural industry;

Shall be engaged chiefly in agricultural work; and

Not more than seventy-five percent (75%) shall be members of the same political party.

One (1) member shall be appointed from each of the four (4) board of agriculture youth leadership quadrants as follows:

The northeast quadrant shall consist of Campbell, Crook, Johnson, Niobrara, Sheridan and Weston counties;

The northwest quadrant shall consist of Big Horn, Hot Springs, Park, Teton and Washakie counties;

The southeast quadrant shall consist of Albany, Converse, Goshen, Laramie, Natrona and Platte counties; and

The southwest quadrant shall consist of Carbon, Fremont, Lincoln, Sublette, Sweetwater and Uinta counties.

The four (4) members appointed from the board of agriculture youth leadership quadrants:

Shall be selected by considering a cross-section of the agricultural industry;

Shall be engaged chiefly in agricultural work;

Shall be between eighteen (18) and thirty (30) years of age at the time of submitting the application for board membership; and

Shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years.

A majority of the appointed members of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

Appointments and terms shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 100, §§ 2, 5; R.S. 1931, §§ 5-102, 5-104; C.S. 1945, §§ 34-102, 34-104; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-3, 11-5; Laws 1963, ch. 80, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, §

11-2-201

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1989, ch. 5, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2005, ch. 242, § 2; 2007, ch. 204, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 207; 2012, ch. 91, § 1; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Cross references. —

As to supervision and management of farms and experimental stations, see §

21-17-301

.

The 2005 amendment,

deleted “or his designated representative” following “including the governor” in (a).

Laws 2005, ch. 242, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2005.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), substituted “thirteen (13)” for “nine (9),” substituted “Eleven (11) voting” for “Seven (7)”; added (e) and (f), and the designations (b) through (d); in present (c), substituted “six (6)” for “four (4)”; substituted “appointment” for “various” in (d); redesignated former (c) and (d) as (g) and (h); and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (h), deleted “Effective July 1, 1979” at the beginning.

The 2012 amendment,

substituted present (c) for former (c), which read: “Appointed members shall be appointed for a term of six (6) years.”; and added (f)(iv), and made related changes.

Laws 2012, ch. 91, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “seventy-five percent (75%)” for “four (4)” in (d)(iii).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 204, § 3, states as follows: “W.S. 11-2-102(f) shall not apply to members of the board of agriculture appointed prior to the effective date of this act, but shall apply to members of the board of agriculture appointed after the effective date of this act.”

Laws 2012, ch. 91, § 2, states as follows: “Nothing in this act shall affect the terms of members currently serving on the board of agriculture. This act and the modification of the term for members appointed from the board of agriculture youth leadership quadrants to the board of agriculture shall apply upon expiration of terms of the current members.”

Laws 2016, ch. 119 § 3, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority, board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, ch. 204, § 2 states as follows: “There is appropriated from the general fund to the department of agriculture twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) for the purpose of implementing this act through June 30, 2008.”

§ 11-2-103.
Regular and special meetings.

The board shall meet
annually on the second Monday of April, and special meetings of the
board may be held by a call of the director, the president of the
board or a majority of the members of the board.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 100, § 4; 1925, ch. 24, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 5-103; C.S. 1945, § 34-103; Laws 1951, ch. 53, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-6; W.S. 1977, §

11-2-202

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 11-2-104.
Salary
and expenses; oath; election of president and vice-president.

The board members, except
the governor and the dean of the University of Wyoming college of
agriculture, shall be paid the salary, for attending and traveling
to and from official board business shall be one hundred dollars ($100.00)
per day and the mileage and per diem for attending and traveling to
and from official board business in the same manner and amount as
state employees. The appointed board members, within a reasonable
time after their appointment, shall qualify by taking the constitutional
oath of office and filing it with the secretary of state. The appointed
members shall elect from their members a president and vice-president.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 100, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 5-105; C.S. 1945, § 34-105; W.S. 1957, § 11-7; W.S. 1977, §

11-2-203

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2007, ch. 204, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional oath of office, see art. 6, §§ 20 and 21, Wyo. Const.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote the first sentence relating to the salary and mileage for official board business.